Utah statutes.
61-2f-308.   Exclusive brokerage agreement.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Client" means a person who makes an exclusive brokerage agreement with a principal broker under Subsection (1)(c).

(b)  "Closed" means that:

(i)  the documents required to be executed under the contract are executed;

(ii)  the money required to be paid by either party under the contract is paid in the form of collected or cleared funds;

(iii)  the proceeds of any new loan are delivered by the lender to the seller; and

(iv)  the applicable documents are recorded in the office of the county recorder for the county in which the real estate is located.

(c)  "Exclusive brokerage agreement" means a written agreement between a client and a principal broker:

(i) (A)  to list for sale, lease, or exchange:

(I)  real estate;

(II)  an option on real estate; or

(III)  an improvement on real estate; or

(B)  for representation in the purchase, lease, or exchange of:

(I)  real estate;

(II)  an option on real estate; or

(III)  an improvement on real estate;

(ii)  that gives the principal broker the sole right to act as the agent or representative of the client for the purchase, sale, lease, or exchange of:

(A)  real estate;

(B)  an option on real estate; or

(C)  an improvement on real estate; and

(iii)  that gives the principal broker the expectation of receiving valuable consideration in exchange for the principal broker's services.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a principal broker subject to an exclusive brokerage agreement shall:

(i)  accept delivery of and present to the client offers and counteroffers to buy, lease, or exchange the client's real estate;

(ii)  assist the client in developing, communicating, and presenting offers, counteroffers, and notices; and

(iii)  answer any question the client has concerning:

(A)  an offer;

(B)  a counteroffer;

(C)  a notice; and

(D)  a contingency.

(b)  A principal broker subject to an exclusive brokerage agreement need not comply with Subsection (2)(a) after:

(i) (A)  an agreement for the sale, lease, or exchange of the real estate, option on real estate, or improvement on real estate is signed;

(B)  the contingencies related to the sale, lease, or exchange are satisfied or waived; and

(C)  the sale, lease, or exchange is closed; or

(ii)  the exclusive brokerage agreement expires or terminates.

(3)  A principal broker who violates this section is subject to Sections 61-2f-404 and 61-2f-405.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session

